Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2973.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 34-18-19 of the General Laws in Chapter 34-18 entitled "Residential
Landlord and Tenant Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
34-18-19. Security deposits.
(a) A landlord may not demand or receive a security deposit, however denominated, in an
amount or value in excess of one month’s periodic rent.
(b) Upon termination of the tenancy, the amount of security deposit due to the tenant shall
be the entire amount given by the tenant as a security deposit, minus any amount of unpaid accrued
rent, the amount due, if any, for reasonable cleaning expenses, the amount due, if any, for
reasonable trash disposal expenses and the amount of physical damages to the premises, other than
ordinary wear and tear, that the landlord has suffered by reason of the tenant’s noncompliance with
§ 34-18-24, all as itemized by the landlord in a written notice delivered to the tenant. The landlord
shall deliver the notice, together with the amount of the security deposit due to the tenant, within
twenty (20) days after the later of either termination of the tenancy, delivery of possession, or the
tenant’s providing the landlord with a forwarding address for the purpose of receiving the security
deposit.
(1) All security deposits received by a landlord of six (6) or more dwelling units shall be
deposited into federally insured deposit accounts earning interest at a rate not less than the
prevailing market rate of interest for regular savings accounts as established in § 19-9-2 or another
standard adopted by the department of business regulation in concurrence with the department of

housing. All interest accrued shall be the property of the tenant.
(2) Upon termination of the tenancy, the amount of security deposit due to the tenant shall
be the entire amount given by the tenant as a security deposit, plus all interest accrued, minus any
amount of unpaid accrued rent, the amount due, if any, for reasonable cleaning expenses, the
amount due, if any, for reasonable trash disposal expenses and the amount of physical damages to
the premises, other than ordinary wear and tear, that the landlord has suffered by reason of the
tenant's noncompliance with § 34-18-24, all as itemized by the landlord in a written notice delivered
to the tenant.
(3) The landlord shall deliver the notice, together with the amount of the security deposit
due to the tenant, within twenty (20) days after the latter of either termination of the tenancy,
delivery of possession, or the tenant's providing the landlord with a forwarding address for the
purpose of receiving the security deposit.
(c) If the landlord fails to comply with subsection (b), the tenant may recover the amount
due him or her, together with damages in an amount equal to twice the amount wrongfully withheld,
and reasonable attorney fees.
(d) This section does not preclude the landlord or tenant from recovering other damages to
which he or she may be entitled under this chapter.
(e) This section does not preclude any landlord who rents a furnished apartment from
demanding or receiving a furniture security deposit if the replacement value of the furniture being
furnished by the landlord valued at the time the lease is executed is five thousand dollars ($5,000)
or greater, in which instance the landlord may charge a separate furniture security deposit of up to
one month’s periodic rent.
(f) Upon termination of the tenancy, the amount of furniture security deposit due to the
tenant shall be the entire amount given by the tenant as a furniture security deposit, minus the
amount due, if any, for reasonable cleaning expenses and repair and the amount of physical
damages to the furniture, other than ordinary wear and tear. The landlord shall deliver the notice,
together with the amount of the furniture security deposit due to the tenant, within twenty (20) days
after the later of either termination of the tenancy, delivery of possession, or the tenant’s providing
the landlord with a forwarding address for the purpose of receiving the furniture security deposit.
(g) In the event the landlord transfers his or her interest in the premises, the holder of the
landlord’s interest in the premises at the time of the termination of the tenancy is bound by this
section.
(h) No rental agreement shall contain any waiver of the provisions of this section.
LC005287 - Page 2 of 4

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005287
========
LC005287 - Page 3 of 4